Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,105
Reliance upon certification of trust; liability.

A person who acts in reliance upon a certification of trust without any knowledge that the representations contained in the certification of trust are incorrect is not liable to any person for such actions. A person who does not know that the representations contained in the certification of trust are incorrect may assume without inquiry the existence of the representations contained in the certification of trust. Knowledge may not be inferred solely from the fact that a copy of all or part of a trust instrument is held by the person relying upon the certification of trust.

Laws 2000, LB 1197, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 30-3704;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 105.